Hawaii statutes.
§490:1-206 Presumptions. Whenever this
chapter creates a "presumption" with respect to a fact, or provides
that a fact is "presumed", the trier of fact shall find the existence
of the fact unless evidence is introduced that supports a finding of its nonexistence.
[L 2004, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next